Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.1 Transportation of School Pupils Beyond City and Town Limits
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-21.1-1.
General purposes.

This chapter shall be construed and applied to:

Create a state plan for the busing of pupils beyond city or town limits, in recognition of the legislative policy to encourage the establishment of and continuance of consolidated and regional schools;

Provide a unified statewide busing service;

Afford to pupils who attend public schools the opportunity at the election of the school committee of the city or town in which the pupils reside to attend a public school, either full time or part time, outside of the city or town which provides a program or curriculum not available within the city or town in which the pupil resides, as authorized by §

16-3.1-1

et seq.;

Afford to children with disabilities equal educational opportunity;

Afford bus transportation to pupils who attend nonpublic nonprofit schools which are consolidated, regionalized, or otherwise established to serve residents of a specific area within the state, and who may be counted for purposes of reimbursement to cities and towns under the state aid formula provided by §

16-7-22

et seq.;

Conserve valuable natural resources by reducing the number of vehicles necessary to transport pupils to school; and

Provide for the transportation of public school students who attend schools located outside of the city or town in which they reside, to protect the health, safety, and welfare of pupils who live at such distances from the schools which they attend as to make it impractical or hazardous to require the pupil to walk to school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 25; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 25.

16-21.1-2.
School bus districts established.

There are hereby established school bus districts within the state to provide bus transportation in the interest of public safety, health, and welfare for pupils in grades kindergarten through twelve (12), or in special education programs, who attend public schools, including vocational schools and special education programs provided in accord with regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, consolidated schools, regional schools established under the provisions of §

16-3-1

et seq., or who participate in cooperative programs as provided by §

16-3.1-1

et seq., and nonpublic nonprofit schools which are consolidated, regionalized, or otherwise established to serve residents of a specific area within the state which schools satisfy the requirements of law for any of the grades of school, kindergarten through twelve (12), as follows:

Region I: The towns of Burrillville, North Smithfield, and Cumberland, and the city of Woonsocket;

Region II: The county of Kent, except the town of West Greenwich and the towns of Foster, Glocester, and Scituate;

Region III: The towns of Lincoln, Smithfield, Johnston, North Providence, Barrington, Warren, and Bristol, and the cities of Cranston, Central Falls, East Providence, Pawtucket, and Providence;

Region IV: The county of Washington and the towns of Jamestown and West Greenwich;

Region V: The towns of Little Compton, Middletown, Portsmouth, and Tiverton, and the city of Newport.

A pupil attending a school, including a public school, vocational school, special education program provided in accord with regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, a regional school established under the provisions of §

16-3-1

et seq., as authorized by §

16-3.1-1

et seq., or a nonpublic nonprofit school for grades kindergarten through twelve (12), consolidated, regionalized, or otherwise established to serve residents of a specific area within the state for any of the grades of schools, kindergarten through twelve (12), in the interest of public safety, health, and welfare, shall be provided with bus transportation to the school or facility which the pupil attends, within the region in which the pupil resides, by the school committee of the city or town within which the pupil resides. The cost of transporting a pupil attending a charter school, the William M. Davies, Jr. Career and Technical High School (“Davies”), or the Metropolitan Regional Career and Technical Center (“the Met Center”) within the established region shall be charged to the receiving school at the same grade level transportation per pupil cost of the resident district. Districts may offer transportation to charter schools, Davies, or the Met Center outside the established region in order to facilitate efficiency provided there is not additional cost to the resident district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 51; P.L. 2010, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 125, § 2.

16-21.1-3.
Variances permitted.

Variances to require a city or town to provide bus transportation to a pupil who attends a school, except a special education facility, outside the region in which the pupil resides shall be granted by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education if he or she finds that:

There is no similar school within the region;

The transportation is necessary to provide an educational opportunity which the pupil has a right to pursue; and

The school building which the pupil attends is within fifteen (15) miles of the city or town of which the pupil is a resident.

Variances to require a city or town to provide bus transportation to a pupil entitled to enrollment in a special education program, provided in accord with regulations of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, shall be granted by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education if he or she finds that the transportation is necessary in order that the pupil enroll in a special education facility located outside of the region and there is no similar facility within the region.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1.

16-21.1-4.
Duties of school committees.

It shall be the duty of the respective school committees of the city or town to provide the bus transportation required by this chapter, either by the use of its own bus facilities and personnel or by contract. School committees may enter into contracts as they deem necessary in order to accomplish the requirements of this chapter, and may enter into cooperative agreements with other school committees for the purposes of conforming to the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1.

16-21.1-5.
Hearings — Commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

All controversies arising out of application of any provision of this chapter shall be determined by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or his or her designated hearing officer who shall afford a hearing to the pupil and school committee concerned, and, after a hearing, shall render a decision. The decision of the commissioner, or the grant or denial of a variance shall be final except that the pupil or school committee aggrieved by the decision or the grant or denial of a variance shall have a right of appeal to the superior court which shall affirm the decision or the grant or denial of a variance unless it is clearly erroneous or contrary to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 369, § 1.

16-21.1-6.
Repealer.

All acts or parts of acts and all regulations relating to or providing for transportation of pupils beyond city or town limits, except as provided in this chapter, are repealed and are null and void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 149, § 1.

16-21.1-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 553, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 1, effective June 30, 2011.

16-21.1-8.
Statewide transportation system for all students.

Notwithstanding the regional structure created in this chapter, and upon implementation of a statewide school transportation system for all students, each school committee shall purchase the transportation services for their own resident students by accessing this integrated statewide system of transportation on a fee-for-service basis for each child; provided, however, that any school committee that fulfills its transportation obligations predominantly through the use of district-owned buses or district employees may apply for a variance from the commissioner of education, or the commissioner’s designee, thereby requesting that its transportation obligations continue to be achieved through the use of the buses owned by the district and staffed by district employees. All fees paid for transportation services provided to students under the statewide system shall be paid into a statewide student transportation services restricted receipt account within the department of elementary and secondary education. Payments from the account shall be limited to payments to the transportation service provider and transportation system consultants. This restricted receipt account shall not be subject to the indirect cost recoveries provisions set forth in §

35-4-27

. The goals of the statewide system of transportation for all students shall be the reduction of duplication of cost and routes in transporting children from the various cities and towns using different buses within and between each city and town, the improvement of services to children through the development of shorter ride times and more efficient routes of travel, and the reduction of cost to local school committees through achieving efficiency in eliminating the need for each school district to contract for and provide these transportation services separately.

There shall be deducted from the final aid payment to each school district any amounts owed to the state at the end of the fiscal year for transportation of the district’s students under the statewide transportation system established pursuant to this section. Districts shall receive monthly invoices summarizing the basis of the transportation fees charged. Any such deductions in aid shall be transferred to the statewide student transportation services restricted receipt account, as set forth in §

35-4-27

.

No school committee shall negotiate, extend, or renew any public transportation service contract unless the contract provides for payments to school bus drivers, attendants, monitors, and aides for one hundred and eighty (180) days or the length of the contracted-for school year, whichever is longer.

With respect to any contract entered into under this section, a school committee or local education agency shall give a preference in contract and/or subcontract awards to the public transportation provider that uses electric buses to the greatest extent. This preference shall be given equal weight to any other preferences available to vendors.

With respect to any contract entered into under this section, no school committee or local education agency (“LEA”) shall take any adverse disciplinary action against any school bus driver, attendant, monitor, or aide covered by a collective bargaining agreement prior to any investigation or action taken by the contracting entity as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement. Nor shall the school committee or LEA impose discipline in excess of what is provided for in the governing collective bargaining agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 553, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 12, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-21.1-9.
Oversight of statewide transportation system.

Upon implementation of the statewide system of transportation, the department of elementary and secondary education shall manage and oversee the system in collaboration with the office of statewide planning at the department of administration, and the Rhode Island public transit authority. Should outsourcing of this function be deemed more efficient, management of the system may be delegated to an outside consultant through a competitive request for proposals.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 12, § 3.